Mississippi, session 2026, SB2828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Any licensee under this chapter shall collect a fee of Seven Dollars and Fifty Cents ($7.50) for each transaction not in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and, in addition, an amount equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) of any amount in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (2)  The fee prescribed by subsection (1) of this section shall be remitted quarterly to the Department of Revenue on forms prescribed by the department.  All required forms and remittances shall be filed with the Department of Revenue not later than the fifteenth day of the month following the close of each calendar quarter. (3)  The Department of Revenue shall remit half of the revenues derived from the fee to the Law Enforcement 287(g) Program Fund created in Section 2 of this act, and the other half of the revenues derived from the fee to the State General Fund. (4)  Every licensee shall post a notice, on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue, informing customers that, upon filing an individual income tax return with either a valid social security number or a valid taxpayer identification number, the customer shall be entitled to an income tax credit equal to the amount of the fee paid by the customer for the transaction, as provided in Section 3 of this act. (5)  If a licensee fails to file the forms or remit the fees as required by subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner shall have the authority to suspend the license of the licensee.  The licensee may not reapply for a license until all required forms have been filed and all required fee amounts have been remitted. (6)  Upon request from the Department of Revenue, the commissioner or the Attorney General may make a claim against the surety bond of the licensee on behalf of the State of Mississippi. (7)  This section shall not apply to any transaction for which the funds being transferred are: (a)  Withdrawn from an account held in or by a federally insured financial institution; or (b)  Funded with a debit card or a credit card issued in the United States. (8)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2029. SECTION 2. (1)  A special fund, to be designated as the "Law Enforcement 287(g) Program Fund," is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (2)  Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Public Safety, to assist the enforcement efforts of state and local law enforcement officers partnering with U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) through the 287(g) Program under the Immigration and Nationality Act. SECTION 3.  There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter the amount of any fee paid under Section 1 of this act during calendar year 2026 or any calendar year thereafter.  The credit may be claimed for the taxable year in which the fee was paid.  Any credit claimed under this section but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for the three (3) succeeding tax years. SECTION 4.  Section 75-16-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-16-5.  Definitions. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply: (a)  "Acting in concert" means persons knowingly acting together with a common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not pursuant to an express agreement. (b)  "Authorized delegate" means a person a licensee designates to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee. (c)  "Average daily money transmission liability" means the amount of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state at the end of each day in a given period of time, added together and divided by the total number of days in the given period of time.  For purposes of calculating average daily money transmission liability under this chapter for any licensee required to do so, the given period of time shall be the quarters ending March 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31. (d)  "Bank Secrecy Act" means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 USC Section 5311 et seq. and its implementing regulations, as amended and recodified from time to time. (e)  "Closed loop stored value" means stored value that is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the issuer or its affiliate or franchisees of the issuer or its affiliate, except to the extent required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for its cash value. (f)  "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance of the State of Mississippi. ( * * *fg)  "Control" means: (i)  1.  The power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee; 2.  The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals or executive officers, managers, directors, trustees or other persons exercising managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; or 3.  The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee; (ii)  Rebuttable Presumption of Control; 1.  A person is presumed to exercise a controlling influence when the person holds the power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee; 2.  A person presumed to exercise a controlling influence as defined by this paragraph (f) can rebut the presumption of control if the person is a passive investor; (iii)  For purposes of determining the percentage of a person controlled by any other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated with the interest of any other immediate family member, including the person's spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers- and fathers-in-law, sons- and daughters-in-law, brothers- and sisters-in-law, and any other person who shares such person's home. (h)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance. ( * * *gi)  "Eligible rating" means a credit rating of any of the three (3) highest rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby each category may include rating category modifiers such as "plus" or "minus" for S&P, or the equivalent for any other eligible rating service.  Long-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to A- or higher by S&P, or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service.  Short-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to or higher than A-2 or SP-2 by S&P, or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service.  In the event that ratings differ among eligible rating services, the highest rating shall apply when determining whether a security bears an eligible rating. ( * * *hj)  "Eligible rating service" means any Nationally Recognized Statistical Rating Organization (NRSRO) as defined by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and any other organization designated by the commissioner by rule, regulation or order. ( * * *ik)  "Federally insured depository financial institution" means a bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank or industrial loan company organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States, when such bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank or industrial loan company has federally insured deposits. ( * * *jl)  "In this state" means at a physical location within this state for a transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested electronically or by phone, the provider of money transmission may determine if the person requesting the transaction is "in this state" by relying on other information provided by the person regarding the location of the individual's residential address or a business entity's principal place of business or other physical address location, and any records associated with the person that the provider of money transmission may have that indicate such location, including, but not limited to, an address associated with an account. ( * * *km)  "Individual" means a natural person. ( * * *ln)  "Key individual" means any individual ultimately responsible for establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, such as an executive officer, manager, director or trustee. ( * * *mo)  "Licensee" means a person licensed under this chapter. ( * * *np)  "Material litigation" means litigation, that according to United States generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to a person's financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the person's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records. ( * * *oq)  "Money" means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States or a foreign government.  The term includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two (2) or more governments. ( * * *pr)  "Monetary value" means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money. ( * * *qs)  "Money transmission" means any of the following: (i)  Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in this state; (ii)  Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this state; and (iii)  Receiving money or monetary value for transmission from a person located in this state. ( * * *rt)  "MSB accredited state" means a state agency that is accredited by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money Transmitter Regulators Association for money transmission licensing and supervision. ( * * *su)  "Multistate licensing process" means any agreement entered into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of applications for money transmission licenses, applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control determinations, or notice and information requirements for a change of key individuals. ( * * *tv)  "NMLS" means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries. ( * * *uw)  "Outstanding money transmission obligations" shall be established and extinguished in accordance with applicable state law and shall mean: (i)  Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the licensee to a person located in the United States or reported as sold by an authorized delegate of the licensee to a person who is located in the United States that has not yet been paid or refunded by or for the licensee, or escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws; (ii)  Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an authorized delegate in the United States from a person located in the United States that has not been received by the payee or refunded to the sender, or escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws; or (iii)  For purposes of this paragraph (u), "in the United States" shall include, to the extent applicable, a person in any state, territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or a U.S. military installation that is located in a foreign country. ( * * *vx)  "Passive investor" means a person that: (i)  Does not have the power to elect a majority of key individuals or executive officers, managers, directors, trustees or other persons exercising managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; (ii)  Is not employed by and does not have any managerial duties of the licensee or person in control of a licensee; (iii)  Does not have the power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee; and (iv)  Either: 1.  Attests to subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) in this paragraph, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the commissioner; or 2.  Commits to the passivity characteristics of subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph, in a written document. ( * * *wy)  "Payment instrument" means a written or electronic check, draft, money order, traveler's check or other written or electronic instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value, whether or not negotiable.  The term does not include stored value or any instrument that (i) is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the issuer or its affiliate or franchisees of the issuer or its affiliate, except to the extent required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for its cash value; or (ii) is not sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program. ( * * *xz)  "Person" means any individual, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association, joint-stock corporation or other corporate entity identified by the commissioner. ( * * *yaa)  "Receiving money for transmission" or "money received for transmission" means receiving money or monetary value in the United States for transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or other means. ( * * *zab)  "Stored value" means monetary value representing a claim against the issuer evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or monetary value, or payment for goods or services.  The term includes, but is not limited to, "prepaid access" as defined by 31 CFR Section 1010.100, as amended or recodified from time to time.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "stored value" does not include a payment instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards or promotional program. ( * * *aaac)  "Tangible net worth" means the aggregate assets of a licensee excluding all intangible assets, less liabilities, as determined in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles. SECTION 5.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 16, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Section 3 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.